Illinois, session 104th, HB3305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 22 to Article 10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 22 heading new)7Division 22. Dark stores 8    (35 ILCS 200/10-900 new)9    Sec. 10-900. Dark stores; assessment. Notwithstanding any 10other provision of law, beginning in taxable year 2026, dark 11stores shall be assessed as active properties. As used in this 12Section "dark store" means a retail space that is solely used 13to fulfill online orders or a vacant retail space. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.